California, session 20252026, AB584.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17110 of the Penal Code is amended to read:17110. As used in Section 26890, “secure facility” means a building that meets all of the following specifications:(a) All perimeter doorways shall meet one of the following:(1) A windowless steel security door equipped with both a dead bolt and a doorknob lock.(2) A windowed metal door that is equipped with both a dead bolt and a doorknob lock. If the window has an opening of five inches or more measured in any direction, the window shall be covered with steel bars of at least one-half of an inch diameter or metal grating of at least nine gauge affixed to the exterior or interior of the door.(3) A metal grate that is padlocked and affixed to the licensee’s premises independent of the door and doorframe.(4) (A) A windowed or windowless steel door that is equipped with panic hardware that operates a multipoint lock that bolts into the interior frame of the door.(B) The door shall have a latch guard over the bolt closest to the primary locking bolt to protect it from prying or cutting.(C) If the door is windowed and the window has an opening of five inches or more measured in any direction, the window shall be covered with steel bars of at least one-half of an inch diameter or metal grating of at least nine gauge affixed to the exterior or interior of the door.(b) All windows are covered with steel bars.(c) Heating, ventilating, air-conditioning, and service openings are secured with steel bars, metal grating, or an alarm system.(d) Any metal grates have spaces no larger than six inches wide measured in any direction.(e) Any metal screens have spaces no larger than three inches wide measured in any direction.(f) All steel bars shall be no further than six inches apart.SEC. 2. Section 29141 of the Penal Code is amended to read:29141. Except as otherwise provided in Section 29142, as used in this chapter, “secure facility” means that the facility satisfies all of the following:(a) The facility is equipped with a burglar alarm with central monitoring.(b) All perimeter entries to areas in which firearms are stored other than doors, including windows and skylights, are secured with steel window guards or an audible, silent, or sonic alarm to detect entry.(c) All perimeter doorways are designed in one of the following ways:(1) A windowless steel security door equipped with both a deadbolt and a doorknob lock.(2) A windowed metal door equipped with both a deadbolt and a doorknob lock. If the window has an opening of five inches or more measured in any direction, the window is covered with steel bars of at least one-half of an inch diameter or metal grating of at least nine gauge affixed to the exterior or interior of the door.(3) A metal grate that is padlocked and affixed to the licensee’s premises independent of the door and doorframe.(4) Hinges and hasps attached to doors by welding, riveting, or bolting with nuts on the inside of the door.(5) Hinges and hasps installed on doors so that they cannot be removed when the doors are closed and locked.(6) (A) A windowed or windowless steel door that is equipped with panic hardware that operates a multipoint lock that bolts into the interior frame of the door.(B) The door shall have a latch guard over the bolt closest to the primary locking bolt to protect it from prying or cutting.(C) If the door is windowed and the window has an opening of five inches or more measured in any direction, the window shall be covered with steel bars of at least one-half of an inch diameter or metal grating of at least nine gauge affixed to the exterior or interior of the door.(d) Heating, ventilating, air-conditioning, and service openings are secured with steel bars, metal grating, or an alarm system.(e) No perimeter metal grates are capable of being entered by any person.(f) Steel bars used to satisfy the requirements of this section are not capable of being entered by any person.(g) Perimeter walls of rooms in which firearms are stored are constructed of concrete or at least 10-gauge expanded steel wire mesh utilized along with typical wood frame and drywall construction. If firearms are not stored in a vault, the facility shall use an exterior security-type door along with a high security, single-key deadbolt, or other door that is more secure. All firearms shall be stored in a separate room away from any general living area or work area. Any door to the storage facility shall be locked while unattended.(h) Perimeter doorways, including the loading dock area, are locked at all times when not attended by paid employees or contracted employees, including security guards.(i) Except when a firearm is currently being tested, any ammunition on the premises is removed from all manufactured guns and stored in a separate and locked room, cabinet, or box away from the storage area for the firearms. Ammunition may be stored with a weapon only in a locked safe.